Washington statutes.
RCW 19.130.020

Sales of new or reconditioned telephone equipment—Disclosure of certain information.

Any person offering for sale or selling new or reconditioned telephone handsets or keysets, private branch exchanges, or private automatic branch exchanges of not more than a twenty-station capacity, shall clearly disclose prior to sale by methods which may include posting of notice or printing on the equipment package the following:

(1) Whether the equipment uses pulse, tone, pulse-or-tone, or other signaling methods, and a general description of the services that can be accessed through the equipment;

(2) Whether the equipment is registered with the federal communications commission under the applicable federal regulations;

(3) The person responsible for repair of the equipment;

(4) Standard repair charges, if any; and

(5) The terms of any written warranty offered with the equipment.

[ 1984 c 275 s 2.]